Missouri, session 2026, HB3163.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 1.226, to read as follows:
1.226. 1. As used in this section, "state department" means each department,
division, office, board, bureau, commission, or other unit of the executive branch of state
government.
2. Each state department that receives any revenues in the course of such
department's management of the state's natural resources shall remit the amount of
such revenues that is above the amount authorized by statute for such department to
retain for administrative purposes and as provided in subsection 3 of this section to the
county in which such natural resources are located as provided in this section.
3. The department may retain fifty percent of such amounts described in
subsection 2 of this section. The remaining fifty percent shall be remitted to counties as
follows:
(1) Twenty-five percent to the county general fund of the county in which such
natural resources are located; and
(2) Twenty-five percent to each school district where such natural resources are
located, to be distributed to such districts equitably on a weighted average daily
attendance basis.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3163 2
4. This section shall become effective beginning on January first of the year
immediately following the passage and approval by the voters of a constitutional
amendment submitted to them by the general assembly regarding authorization for the
general assembly to enact laws to provide for the method and proportion of remittances
of state department revenues from management of state natural resources.
✔